Utah statutes.
63E-2-103.   Public purpose -- Legislative findings.
(1)  Each independent corporation shall have a specific public purpose related
to the state or its citizens stated in its authorizing statute.
(2)  Prior to enacting its authorizing statute, the Legislature shall make a
finding that the independent corporation needs to be created by the state or
be given by the state the right to exist and conduct its affairs as an
independent corporation to serve its public purpose.
(3)  Prior to enacting an authorizing statute, the Legislature shall also make
a finding that:
(a)  if the independent corporation receives ongoing state funding for
operations, it:
(i)  performs a public purpose that is not performed by private entities; or
(ii)  acts as a trustee over monies held in trust;
(b)  if the independent corporation does not receive ongoing state funding for
operations, it requires:
(i)  exemption from federal or state income tax to meet its public purpose; or
(ii)  the interest on its indebtedness to be exempt from federal or state
income tax to meet its public purpose; or
(c)  the independent corporation is created by the Utah Constitution.
